Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-157
Division; real property; lease; when; requirements.

The division may lease for a period not exceeding twelve years real property held by the division that has been offered for sale for two consecutive years and has not been sold. The lease shall provide for annual rental payments based on fair rental value. The rental payments shall be deposited in the Aeronautics Cash Fund. The division shall cause reappraisals to be made of the land under lease when it deems it necessary due to changes in buildings or improvements, changes in the land, or for other reasons. The division may, after the expiration of any lease, offer such land for sale by public auction as set forth in section 3-155 or may enter into another lease.

Laws 1978, LB 637, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 896, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 446, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 47.